Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(b) “Health system” means:
(A) A parent corporation of one or more health care facilities, urgent care centers or
other entities that provide  health care services, and any entity affiliated with the parent
corporation through ownership, governance, control or membership; or
(B) A health care facility, urgent care center or other entity that provides health care
services, and any entity  affiliated with the health care facility, urgent care center or other
entity that provides  health care services through ownership, governance, control or mem-
bership.
(c) “Licensed health care provider” means:
(A) A physician licensed under ORS chapter 677;
(B) A physician associate licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525; or
(C) A nurse practitioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390.
(d) “Specialty  urgent care center” means a facility or portion of a facility that provides
to individuals, on a walk-in and episodic basis:
(A) For illnesses or injuries that are acute but not life-threatening  or that do not require
emergency medical services, medical care related only to a specific body system; or
(B) Behavioral health care services only.
(e)(A) “Urgent care center” means a facility or portion of a facility that:
(i) Uses the term “urgent” or “urgent care” to describe the facility or portion  of the fa-
cility; and
(ii) Provides medical care to individuals only on a walk-in and episodic  basis for illnesses
or injuries that are acute but not life-threatening or that do not require emergency medical
services.
(B) “Urgent care center” does not include a specialty urgent care center.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a person  or government
entity that does not meet the requirements of subsections (3) to (5) of this  section may not:
Enrolled House Bill 4107 (HB 4107-A) Page 1
(A) Establish, conduct, maintain, manage or operate itself under a  business or trade
name, assumed business name, fictitious business  name or other designation that includes
the terms “urgent” or “urgent care”; or
(B) Use the term “urgent” or “urgent care” in any external sign or advertisement.
(b) The prohibitions  described in paragraph (a) of this subsection do not apply to a spe-
cialty urgent care center that  uses the term “urgent” or “urgent care” in conjunction with
the term for the specialty medical care that the specialty urgent care center provides.
(3) An urgent care center shall publish on a website operated by or  on behalf of the ur-
gent care center, and post near the main public entrance of the urgent care center  in a
manner that is conspicuous, accessible and legible, the following information:
(a) The legal name of the urgent care center and  any name under which the urgent care
center does business;
(b) The street address of the urgent care center;
(c) Any health care facility or health system affiliated with the urgent care center;
(d) The hours and days of operation for the urgent care center;
(e) The types of payment and types of payers accepted by the urgent care center;
(f) The  services offered at the urgent care center and whether X-ray or laboratory ser-
vices are available at the urgent care center;
(g) The limitations on the availability of services;
(h) The types of licensed health care providers that are available at the  urgent care
center;
(i) Whether the urgent care  center serves patients only by walk-in or by either appoint-
ment or walk-in;
(j) The diagnostic capabilities available at the urgent care center, at a facility  adjacent
or in close proximity to the urgent care center or by referral to  another facility with the
location of that facility or the distance of that facility from the urgent care center; and
(k) Any telemedicine services offered by the urgent care center.
(4)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an urgent care center shall,
at a minimum, have one licensed health care provider on  site during the hours that the ur-
gent care center is open and be capable of providing on site the following services:
(A) Tests for common respiratory diseases;
(B) 12-lead electrocardiogram (ECG);
(C) Splints for strains, sprains and fractures; and
(D) Sutures for simple lacerations.
(b) An urgent care center may operate temporarily without a licensed health care  pro-
vider on site if:
(A) A licensed health care provider is unavailable to be on site  due to illness, emergency
or similar circumstance;
(B) A licensed health care provider is available to offer services through  telemedicine;
and
(C) The urgent care center notifies a patient at  the first point of contact with the patient
that services will be provided through telemedicine.
(5) If an urgent care center refers  a patient to an emergency department, the urgent
care center shall provide  the emergency department with the patient’s records that include
the clinical reason for the referral. The urgent care center may provide the records:
(a) By using a health information exchange; or
(b) If the urgent care center does not participate in a health information exchange, by:
(A) Providing the patient with a physical copy of the records, including the clinical  rea-
son for the referral; or
(B) Other immediate means, including a telephone call, facsimile  or electronic trans-
mission.
(6) An urgent care center may not:
Enrolled House Bill 4107 (HB 4107-A) Page 2
(a) Hold the urgent care center out to the public as providing emergency department
services; or
(b) Use the word “emergency” or the letters  “E.R.” or “E.D.” or any derivative of the
word “emergency” that would lead a reasonable person to believe an urgent care center is
an emergency department of a hospital licensed under ORS 441.025.
Passed by House February 18, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4107 (HB 4107-A) Page 3